apertium-oc-es/apertium-oc-es.oc.metadix
    <pardef n="desl/o[T]jar__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ò</l> 
        <r>o</r> 
      </p>
        <i></i> 
        <par n="abrèu/ja__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
        <i>o</i> 
        <par n="pu/jar__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ò</l> 
        <r>o</r> 
      </p>
        <i></i> 
        <par n="abrèu/jas__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
        <i>o</i> 
        <par n="abreu/javas__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="v/o[]jar__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uè</l> 
        <r>o</r> 
      </p>
        <i></i> 
        <par n="abrèu/jas__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
        <i>o</i> 
        <par n="abreu/javas__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="agr/e[U]jar__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>è</l> 
        <r>e</r> 
      </p>
        <i></i> 
        <par n="abrèu/ja__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
        <i>e</i> 
        <par n="pu/jar__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>è</l> 
        <r>e</r> 
      </p>
        <i></i> 
        <par n="abrèu/jas__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
        <i>e</i> 
        <par n="abreu/javas__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="reb/à[T]er__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l> 
        <r>à</r> 
      </p>
        <i></i> 
        <par n="sent/eria__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
        <i>à</i> 
        <par n="mét/er__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l> 
        <r>à</r> 
      </p>
        <i></i> 
        <par n="tem/eriam__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
        <i>à</i> 
        <par n="tém/er__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m/é[T]er__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l> 
        <r>é</r> 
      </p>
        <i></i> 
        <par n="sent/eria__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
        <i>é</i> 
        <par n="mét/er__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l> 
        <r>é</r> 
      </p>
        <i></i> 
        <par n="tem/eriam__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
        <i>é</i> 
        <par n="tém/er__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="corresp/ó[N]er__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>o</l> 
        <r>ó</r> 
      </p>
        <i></i> 
        <par n="sent/eria__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
        <i>ó</i> 
        <par n="mét/er__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>o</l> 
        <r>ó</r> 
      </p>
        <i></i> 
        <par n="tem/eriam__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
        <i>ó</i> 
        <par n="tém/er__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="j/ú[NH]er__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>u</l> 
        <r>ú</r> 
      </p>
        <i></i> 
        <par n="sent/eria__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
        <i>ú</i> 
        <par n="mét/er__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>u</l> 
        <r>ú</r> 
      </p>
        <i></i> 
        <par n="tem/eriam__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
        <i>ú</i> 
        <par n="tém/er__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="v/é[N]cer__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l> 
        <r>é</r> 
      </p>
        <i></i> 
        <par n="ven/ceríem__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l> 
        <r>é</r> 
      </p>
        <i></i> 
        <par n="ven/ceriam__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
        <i>é</i> 
        <par n="vén/cer__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="esp/à[R]ger__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l> 
        <r>à</r> 
      </p>
        <i></i> 
        <par n="lie/geríem__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
        <i>à</i> 
        <par n="lié/ger__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="li/é[]ger__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l> 
        <r>é</r> 
      </p>
        <i></i> 
        <par n="lie/geríem__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
        <i>é</i> 
        <par n="lié/ger__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="h/í[]ger__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l> 
        <r>í</r> 
      </p>
        <i></i> 
        <par n="lie/geríem__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
        <i>í</i> 
        <par n="lié/ger__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="c/è[RN]er__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l> 
        <r>è</r> 
      </p>
        <i></i> 
        <par n="cern/eríem__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
        <i>è</i> 
        <par n="cèrn/er__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l> 
        <r>è</r> 
      </p>
        <i></i> 
        <par n="cern/eriam__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
        <i>è</i> 
        <par n="cèrn/an__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="j/ó[N]her__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>o</l> 
        <r>ó</r> 
      </p>
        <i></i> 
        <par n="jon/heriam__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
        <i>ó</i> 
        <par n="jón/her__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>u</l> 
        <r>ó</r> 
      </p>
        <i></i> 
        <par n="jun/t__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="p/è[RD]re__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l> 
        <r>è</r> 
      </p>
        <i></i> 
        <par n="perd/eriam__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
        <i>è</i> 
        <par n="pèrd/an__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="res/ò[LV]er__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>o</l> 
        <r>ò</r> 
      </p>
        <i>lv</i> 
        <par n="cern/eríem__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
        <i>òlv</i> 
        <par n="cèrn/er__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
        <par n="res/òlver__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="c/u[LH]ir__vblex">
    <e>
        <i>u</i> 
        <par n="culh/iriam__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uè</l> 
        <r>u</r> 
      </p>
        <i></i> 
        <par n="cuèlh/an__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/o[NH]ar__vblex">
    <e>
        <i>o</i> 
        <par n="cambi/avas__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uè</l> 
        <r>o</r> 
      </p>
        <i></i> 
        <par n="càmbi/as__vblex"/> 
    </e>

    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="abàter">
        <i>ab</i> 
        <par n="reb/à[T]er__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="absòlver" a="carmentano">
        <i>abs</i> 
        <par n="res/ò[LV]er__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="adméter">
        <i>adm</i> 
        <par n="m/é[T]er__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="agreujar">
        <i>agr</i> 
        <par n="agr/e[U]jar__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e r="LR" lm="ahíger">
        <i>ah</i> 
        <par n="h/í[]ger__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="arténher">
        <i>art</i> 
        <par n="m/é[T]er__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="bàter">
        <i>b</i> 
        <par n="reb/à[T]er__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="bandejar">
        <i>band</i> 
        <par n="agr/e[U]jar__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="bloquejar" a="mmonge">
        <i>bloqu</i> 
        <par n="agr/e[U]jar__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="cénher" a="carmentano">
        <i>c</i> 
        <par n="m/é[T]er__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="cóser">
        <i>c</i> 
        <par n="corresp/ó[N]er__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="clarejar">
        <i>clar</i> 
        <par n="agr/e[U]jar__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="coélher">
        <i>co</i> 
        <par n="m/é[T]er__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="cométer">
        <i>com</i> 
        <par n="m/é[T]er__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="combàter">
        <i>comb</i> 
        <par n="reb/à[T]er__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="comprométer">
        <i>comprom</i> 
        <par n="m/é[T]er__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="confóner">
        <i>conf</i> 
        <par n="corresp/ó[N]er__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="convéncer">
        <i>conv</i> 
        <par n="v/é[N]cer__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="correspóner">
        <i>corresp</i> 
        <par n="corresp/ó[N]er__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e r="LR" lm="crénher">
        <i>cr</i> 
        <par n="m/é[T]er__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="debàter" a="carmentano">
        <i>deb</i> 
        <par n="reb/à[T]er__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="descéner">
        <i>desc</i> 
        <par n="m/é[T]er__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="deslotjar">
        <i>desl</i> 
        <par n="desl/o[T]jar__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="difóner" a="carmentano">
        <i>dif</i> 
        <par n="corresp/ó[N]er__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="dissòlver" a="carmentano">
        <i>diss</i> 
        <par n="res/ò[LV]er__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="eméter">
        <i>em</i> 
        <par n="m/é[T]er__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="empénher">
        <i>emp</i> 
        <par n="m/é[T]er__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="escuélher">
        <i>escu</i> 
        <par n="m/é[T]er__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="espàrger">
        <i>esp</i> 
        <par n="esp/à[R]ger__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="esténer">
        <i>est</i> 
        <par n="m/é[T]er__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="estrénher">
        <i>estr</i> 
        <par n="m/é[T]er__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="fóter">
        <i>f</i> 
        <par n="corresp/ó[N]er__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="greujar" a=" mmonge">
        <i>gr</i> 
        <par n="agr/e[U]jar__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="hóner">
        <i>h</i> 
        <par n="corresp/ó[N]er__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="híger">
        <i>h</i> 
        <par n="h/í[]ger__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="interrómper">
        <i>interr</i> 
        <par n="corresp/ó[N]er__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="irrómper" a=" mmonge">
        <i>irr</i> 
        <par n="corresp/ó[N]er__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="júnher">
        <i>j</i> 
        <par n="j/ú[NH]er__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="lotjar">
        <i>l</i> 
        <par n="desl/o[T]jar__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e r="LR" lm="léger">
        <i>l</i> 
        <par n="li/é[]ger__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="liéger">
        <i>li</i> 
        <par n="li/é[]ger__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ludrejar">
        <i>ludr</i> 
        <par n="agr/e[U]jar__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="méter">
        <i>m</i> 
        <par n="m/é[T]er__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="mauméter">
        <i>maum</i> 
        <par n="m/é[T]er__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="mestrejar">
        <i>mestr</i> 
        <par n="agr/e[U]jar__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="pèrder">
        <i>p</i> 
        <par n="c/è[RN]er__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="póner">
        <i>p</i> 
        <par n="corresp/ó[N]er__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="pèrdre">
        <i>p</i> 
        <par n="p/è[RD]re__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="passejar">
        <i>pass</i> 
        <par n="agr/e[U]jar__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="perméter">
        <i>perm</i> 
        <par n="m/é[T]er__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="pertànher">
        <i>pert</i> 
        <par n="reb/à[T]er__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="plànher">
        <i>pl</i> 
        <par n="reb/à[T]er__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="prémer">
        <i>pr</i> 
        <par n="m/é[T]er__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="preténer">
        <i>pret</i> 
        <par n="m/é[T]er__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="rénder" a="mmonge">
        <i>r</i> 
        <par n="m/é[T]er__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="rebàter">
        <i>reb</i> 
        <par n="reb/à[T]er__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="rejúnher">
        <i>rej</i> 
        <par n="j/ú[NH]er__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="reméter">
        <i>rem</i> 
        <par n="m/é[T]er__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="resòlver">
        <i>res</i> 
        <par n="res/ò[LV]er__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="respóner">
        <i>resp</i> 
        <par n="corresp/ó[N]er__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="sonhar">
        <i>s</i> 
        <par n="s/o[NH]ar__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="saborejar">
        <i>sabor</i> 
        <par n="agr/e[U]jar__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="sométer">
        <i>som</i> 
        <par n="m/é[T]er__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ténder" a="carmentano">
        <i>t</i> 
        <par n="m/é[T]er__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="transméter">
        <i>transm</i> 
        <par n="m/é[T]er__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="véncer">
        <i>v</i> 
        <par n="v/é[N]cer__vblex"/> 
    </e>
